Utah statutes.
73-10c-9.   Investments of money in security fund.

(1)  Unless otherwise required to preserve the exemption of any obligations of the state from federal taxation, the state treasurer shall invest the money in the security fund by following the procedures and requirements of Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act.

(2)  If necessary to preserve the exemption of any obligations of the state from federal taxation, the board may make investments in any manner necessary to preserve this exemption.

